Florida, session 2026, HB6515.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6515 -00-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S

ENROLLED
HB 6515 2026 Legislature
Section 1. The facts stated in the preamble to this act
are found and declared to be true.
Section 2. Miami-Dade County is authorized and directed to
appropriate from funds not otherwise encumbered and to draw a
warrant in the sum of $500,000 payable to Lourdes Latour and
Edward Latour as compensation for injuries and damages
sustained.
Section 3. The amount paid by Miami-Dade County pursuant
to s. 768.28, Florida Statutes, and the amount awarded under
this act are intended to provide the sole compensation for all
present and future claims arising out of the factual situation
described in this act which resulted in injuries and damages to
Lourdes Latour and Edward Latour. The total amount paid for
attorney fees relating to this claim may not exceed 25 percent
of the total amount awarded under this act.
Section 4. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6515 -00-er